Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-323, 11-10-324. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning compliance with other laws, and agreements authorized, were repealed by Acts 2011, No. 115, § 1. They were derived from the following sources:

11-10-323. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1205, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1010.3.

11-10-324. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1205, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1010.1, 81-1010.2; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1003, §§ 1, 2; 2007, No. 186, § 2.

Subchapter 4
— Employer Coverage

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 25: approved Feb. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an unemployment crisis exists in this State and in order to give better protection to the unemployed and their families extended benefits of the unemployment insurance program should be made available and to alleviate as much as possible the suffering and distress caused by unemployment, it is necessary to work in cooperation with the federal government; and in order to receive the benefits of federal law and comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 91-373, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 376, § 21: approved Mar. 8, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to receive the benefits of Federal law and to comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 94-566 and in order to give better protection to the unemployed workers and their families, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-401. Period.

Except as provided in § 11-10-403, any employing unit that is or becomes an employer subject to this chapter within any calendar year shall be subject to this chapter during the whole of the calendar year.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1111.

11-10-402. Termination.

Except as otherwise provided in § 11-10-403, an employing unit may cease to be an employer subject to this chapter in accordance with the rules of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 8; 1943, No. 256, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1111; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 818; 2019, No. 910, § 229.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-403. Election.

An employing unit, not otherwise subject to this chapter, which filed with the Director of the Division of Workforce Services its written election to become an employer subject hereto for not less than two (2) calendar years shall, with the written approval of the election by the director, become an employer subject hereto to the same extent as all other employers, as of the date stated in the approval.

That employing unit shall cease to be subject hereto as of January 1 of any calendar year subsequent to two (2) calendar years, only if during January of each year it has filed with the director a written notice to that effect.

An employing unit, for which services that do not constitute employment, as defined in this chapter, are performed, may file with the director a written election that all services performed by individuals in its employ in one (1) or more distinct establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute employment for all the purposes of this chapter for not less than two (2) calendar years.

Upon the written approval of the election by the director, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this chapter from and after the date stated in the approval.

The services shall cease to be deemed employment subject hereto as of January 1 of any calendar year subsequent to such two (2) calendar years, only if during January of such year the employing unit has filed with the director a written notice to that effect.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 8; 1947, No. 398, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1111; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 24; 2019, No. 910, § 230.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1).

11-10-404. Nonprofit employers.

Any political subdivision of this state may elect to cover under this chapter service performed by employees in all of the hospitals and institutions of higher education, as defined in §§ 11-10-220 and 11-10-221, operated by the political subdivision.

Election is to be made by filing with the Director of the Division of Workforce Services a notice of the election at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the election.

The election shall exclude any services described in § 11-10-210(a)(4).

Any political subdivision electing coverage under this section shall make payments in lieu of contributions with respect to benefits attributable to the employment as provided with respect to nonprofit organizations in § 11-10-713(c) and (f).

The provisions in § 11-10-509 with respect to benefit rights based on service for state and nonprofit institutions of higher education shall be applicable also to service covered by an election under this section.

The amounts required to be paid in lieu of contributions by any political subdivision under this section shall be billed and payment made as provided in § 11-10-713(d) with respect to similar payments of nonprofit organizations.

An election under this section may be terminated by filing with the director written notice not later than thirty (30) days preceding the last day of the calendar year in which the termination is to be effective. The termination becomes effective as of the first day of the next ensuing calendar year with respect to services performed after that date.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 8; 1971, No. 35, § 16; 1977, No. 376, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1111; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 231.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1)(B).

11-10-405. Contributions liability contingency.

If at any time any of the employments excluded in §§ 11-10-201 — 11-10-226 shall become liable for federal unemployment tax, the employments shall thereupon immediately become liable for contributions under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1949, No. 155, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.